Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-566
Legislature; vacancy; how filled.

(1) When a vacancy occurs in the Legislature, the office shall be filled by the Governor. The Governor shall appoint a suitable person possessing the qualifications necessary for a member of the Legislature.

(2) If the vacancy occurs at any time on or after May 1 of the second year of the term of office, the appointee shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term. If the vacancy occurs at any time prior to May 1 of the second year of the term of office, the appointee shall serve until the first Tuesday following the first Monday in January following the next regular general election and at the regular general election a member of the Legislature shall be elected to serve the unexpired term as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(3)(a) If the vacancy occurs on or after February 1 and prior to May 1 during the second year of the term of office, the vacancy shall be filled at the regular election in November of that year. Candidates shall file petitions to appear on the ballot for such election as provided in section 32-617.

(b) If the vacancy occurs at any time prior to February 1 of the second year of the term of office, the procedure for filling the vacated office shall be the same as the procedure for filling the office at the expiration of the term and candidates shall be nominated and elected at the statewide primary and general elections during the second year of the term.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 162;

Laws 2017, LB451, § 7.